Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-569
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 37-564 to 37-568 shall prohibit authorized personnel of the commission or the United States Department of the Interior in the administration and management of wildlife resources.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 289.